ro-RO: Dimensiunea hârtiei fotografice: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Personalizată; Altele
da: Fotografisk papirstørrelse: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Skræddersyet; Andet
en: Photographic paper size: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Custom; Other
hu: Fotópapír mérete: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Egyéni; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tamanho do papel fotográfico: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Personalizada; Outro
bg-BG: Размер на фотографска хартия: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Персонализиран; Други
cs: Velikost fotografického papíru: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Vlastní; Jiné
vi: Kích thước giấy ảnh: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Tùy chỉnh; Khác
sv: Fotografisk pappersstorlek: 11 x 14 tum; 11 x 17 tum; 13 x 19 tum; 4 x 6 tum; 5 x 7 tum; 8 x 10 tum; 9 x 12 tum; A3; A4; A5; A6; Anpassad; Annat
nb: Fotografisk papirstørrelse: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Tilpasset; Annen
zh-CN: 相纸尺寸: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; 定制; 其他
pt-PT: Tamanho do papel de fotografia: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; À medida; Outro
de: Größe des Fotopapiers: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Maßgeschneidert; Sonstiges
tr: Fotoğraf kağıdı boyutu: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Özel; Diğer
ru: Размер фотобумаги: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Пользовательский; Другое
lt-LT: Fotopopieriaus dydis: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Pasirinktinis; Kita
th: ขนาดกระดาษอัดรูป: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; ปรับเข้ารูป; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Velikost fotografskega papirja: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Po meri; Drugo
es: Tamaño del papel fotográfico: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Personalizado; Otros
fi: Valokuvapaperin koko: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Mukautettu; Muu
it: Formato della carta fotografica: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Personalizzato; Altro
ja: 印画紙のサイズ: 11 x 14インチ; 11 x 17インチ; 13x19インチ; 4 x 6インチ; 5 x 7インチ; 8 x 10インチ; 9 x 12インチ; A3; A4; A5; A6; カスタム; その他
fr: Format du papier photographique: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Personnalisé; Autre
hr-HR: Veličina fotografskog papira: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Prilagođena; Ostalo
sk-SK: Veľkosť fotografického papiera: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Prispôsobený; Iné
zh-TW: 相紙尺寸: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; 客製化; 其他
ko: 인화지 크기: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; 커스텀; 기타
el: Μέγεθος φωτογραφικού χαρτιού: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Custom; Άλλο
nl: Formaat fotopapier: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Aangepast; Andere
pl: Rozmiar papieru fotograficznego: 11" x 14"; 11" x 17"; 13" x 19"; 4" x 6"; 5" x 7"; 8" x 10"; 9" x 12"; A3; A4; A5; A6; Niestandardowe terminy; Pozostałe